czhyph.tex
\patterns{
%samohl ska-souhl ska-samohl ska
a1§a
a1ça
a1Ÿa
a1ýa
a1ca
a1ja
a1Ôa
a1œa
a1åa
a1ha
a1cha
a1ka
ze1j
a1ra
a1da
a1ta
a1na
a1§e
a1çe
a1Ÿe
a1ýe
a1ce
a1je
a1he
a1che
a1ke
a1re
a1de
a1te
a1ne
a1ri
a1§i
a1çi
a1Ÿi
a1ýi
a1ci
a1ji
a1di
a1ti
a1ni
a1§o
a1ço
a1Ÿo
a1ýo
a1co
a1jo
a1Ôo
a1œo
a1åo
a1ho
a1cho
a1ko
a1ro
a1do
a1to
a1no
a1§u
a1çu
a1Ÿu
a1ýu
a1cu
a1ju
a1Ôu
a1œu
a1åu
a1hu
a1chu
a1ku
a1ru
a1du
a1tu
a1nu
a1hy
a1chy
a1ky
a1ry
a1dy
a1ty
a1ny
a1§ 
a1ç 
a1Ÿ 
a1ý 
a1c 
a1j 
a1Ô 
a1œ 
a1å 
a1h 
a1ch 
a1k 
a1r 
a1d 
a1t 
a1n 
a1§‚
a1ç‚
a1Ÿ‚
a1ý‚
a1c‚
a1j‚
a1h‚
a1ch‚
a1k‚
a1r‚
a1d‚
a1t‚
a1n‚
a1§¡
a1ç¡
a1Ÿ¡
a1ý¡
a1c¡
a1j¡
a1d¡
a1t¡
a1n¡
a1k¢
a1r¢
a1d¢
a1t¢
a1n¢
a1hì
a1chì
a1kì
a1rì
a1dì
a1tì
a1nì
a1dØ
a1tØ
a1nØ
e1§a
e1ça
e1Ÿa
e1ýa
e1ca
e1ja
e1Ôa
e1œa
e1åa
e1ha
e1cha
e1ka
e1ra
e1da
e1ta
e1na
e1§e
e1çe
e1Ÿe
e1ýe
e1ce
e1je
e1he
e1che
e1ke
e1re
e1de
e1te
e1ne
e1§i
e1çi
e1Ÿi
e1ýi
e1ci
e1ji
e1di
e1ti
e1ni
e1§o
e1ço
e1Ÿo
e1ýo
e1co
e1jo
e1Ôo
e1œo
e1åo
e1ho
e1cho
e1ko
e1ro
e1do
e1to
e1no
e1§u
e1çu
e1Ÿu
e1ýu
e1cu
e1ju
e1Ôu
e1œu
e1åu
e1hu
e1chu
e1ku
e1ru
e1du
e1tu
e1nu
e1hy
e1chy
e1ky
e1ry
e1dy
e1ty
e1ny
e1§ 
e1ç 
e1Ÿ 
e1ý 
e1c 
e1j 
e1h 
e1ch 
e1k 
e1r 
e1d 
e1t 
e1n 
e1§‚
e1ç‚
e1Ÿ‚
e1ý‚
e1c‚
e1j‚
e1h‚
e1ch‚
e1k‚
e1r‚
e1d‚
e1t‚
e1n‚
e1§¡
e1ç¡
e1Ÿ¡
e1ý¡
e1c¡
e1j¡
e1d¡
e1t¡
e1n¡
e1hì
e1chì
e1kì
e1rì
e1dì
e1tì
e1nì
e1dØ
e1tØ
e1nØ
i1§a
i1ça
i1Ÿa
i1ýa
i1ca
i1ja
i1Ôa
i1œa
i1åa
i1ha
i1cha
i1ka
i1ra
i1da
i1ta
i1na
i1§e
i1çe
i1Ÿe
i1ýe
i1ce
i1je
i1he
i1che
i1ke
i1re
i1de
i1te
i1ne
i1§i
i1çi
i1Ÿi
i1ýi
i1ci
i1ji
i1di
i1ti
i1ni
i1§o
i1ço
i1Ÿo
i1ýo
i1co
i1jo
i1Ôo
i1œo
i1åo
i1ho
i1cho
i1ko
i1ro
i1do
i1to
i1no
i1§u
i1çu
i1Ÿu
i1ýu
i1cu
i1ju
i1Ôu
i1œu
i1åu
i1hu
i1chu
i1ku
i1ru
i1du
i1tu
i1nu
i1hy
i1chy
i1ky
i1ry
i1dy
i1ty
i1ny
i1§ 
i1ç 
i1Ÿ 
i1ý 
i1c 
i1j 
i1Ô 
i1œ 
i1å 
i1h 
i1ch 
i1k 
i1r 
i1d 
i1t 
i1n 
i1§‚
i1ç‚
i1Ÿ‚
i1ý‚
i1c‚
i1j‚
i1h‚
i1ch‚
i1k‚
i1r‚
i1d‚
i1t‚
i1n‚
i1§¡
i1ç¡
i1Ÿ¡
i1ý¡
i1c¡
i1j¡
i1d¡
i1t¡
i1n¡
i1k¢
i1r¢
i1hì
i1chì
i1kì
i1rì
i1dì
i1tì
i1nì
i1dØ
i1tØ
i1nØ
o1§a
o1ça
o1Ÿa
o1ýa
o1ca
o1ja
o1Ôa
o1œa
o1åa
o1ha
o1cha
o1ka
o1ra
o1da
o1ta
o1na
o1§e
o1çe
o1Ÿe
o1ýe
o1ce
o1je
o1he
o1che
o1ke
o1re
o1de
o1te
o1ne
o1§i
o1çi
o1Ÿi
o1ýi
o1ci
o1ji
o1di
o1ti
o1ni
o1§o
o1ço
o1Ÿo
o1ýo
o1co
o1jo
o1Ôo
o1œo
o1åo
o1ho
o1cho
o1ko
o1ro
o1do
o1to
o1no
o1§u
o1çu
o1Ÿu
o1ýu
o1cu
o1ju
o1Ôu
o1œu
o1åu
o1hu
o1chu
o1ku
o1ru
o1du
o1tu
o1nu
o1hy
o1chy
o1ky
o1ry
o1dy
o1ty
o1ny
o1§ 
o1ç 
o1Ÿ 
o1ý 
o1c 
o1j 
o1h 
o1ch 
o1k 
o1r 
o1d 
o1t 
o1n 
o1§‚
o1ç‚
o1Ÿ‚
o1ý‚
o1c‚
o1j‚
o1h‚
o1ch‚
o1k‚
o1r‚
o1d‚
o1t‚
o1n‚
o1§¡
o1ç¡
o1Ÿ¡
o1ý¡
o1c¡
o1j¡
o1d¡
o1t¡
o1n¡
o1hì
o1chì
o1kì
o1rì
o1dì
o1tì
o1nì
o1dØ
o1tØ
o1nØ
u1§a
u1ça
u1Ÿa
u1ýa
u1ca
u1ja
u1Ôa
u1œa
u1åa
u1ha
u1cha
u1ka
u1ra
u1da
u1ta
u1na
u1§e
u1çe
u1Ÿe
u1ýe
u1ce
u1je
u1he
u1che
u1ke
u1re
u1de
u1te
u1ne
u1§i
u1çi
u1Ÿi
u1ýi
u1ci
u1ji
u1di
u1ti
u1ni
u1§o
u1ço
u1Ÿo
u1ýo
u1co
u1jo
u1Ôo
u1œo
u1åo
u1ho
u1cho
u1ko
u1ro
u1do
u1to
u1no
u1§u
u1çu
u1Ÿu
u1ýu
u1cu
u1ju
u1Ôu
u1œu
u1åu
u1hu
u1chu
u1ku
u1ru
u1du
u1tu
u1nu
u1hy
u1chy
u1ky
u1ry
u1dy
u1ty
u1ny
u1§ 
u1ç 
u1Ÿ 
u1ý 
u1c 
u1j 
u1Ô 
u1œ 
u1å 
u1h 
u1ch 
u1k 
u1r 
u1d 
u1t 
u1n 
u1§‚
u1ç‚
u1Ÿ‚
u1ý‚
u1c‚
u1j‚
u1h‚
u1ch‚
u1k‚
u1r‚
u1d‚
u1t‚
u1n‚
u1§¡
u1ç¡
u1Ÿ¡
u1ý¡
u1c¡
u1j¡
u1d¡
u1t¡
u1n¡
u1hì
u1chì
u1kì
u1rì
u1dì
u1tì
u1nì
u1dØ
u1tØ
u1nØ
y1§a
y1ça
y1Ÿa
y1ýa
y1ca
y1ja
y1ha
y1cha
y1ka
y1ra
y1da
y1ta
y1na
y1§e
y1çe
y1Ÿe
y1ýe
y1ce
y1je
y1he
y1che
y1ke
y1re
y1de
y1te
y1ne
y1§i
y1çi
y1Ÿi
y1ýi
y1ci
y1ji
y1di
y1ti
y1ni
y1§o
y1ço
y1Ÿo
y1ýo
y1co
y1jo
y1åo
y1ho
y1cho
y1ko
y1ro
y1do
y1to
y1no
y1§u
y1çu
y1Ÿu
y1ýu
y1cu
y1ju
y1hu
y1chu
y1ku
y1ru
y1du
y1tu
y1nu
y1hy
y1chy
y1ky
y1ry
y1dy
y1ty
y1ny
y1§ 
y1ç 
y1Ÿ 
y1ý 
y1c 
y1j 
y1h 
y1ch 
y1k 
y1r 
y1d 
y1t 
y1n 
y1§‚
y1ç‚
y1Ÿ‚
y1ý‚
y1c‚
y1j‚
y1h‚
y1ch‚
y1k‚
y1r‚
y1d‚
y1t‚
y1n‚
y1§¡
y1ç¡
y1Ÿ¡
y1ý¡
y1c¡
y1j¡
y1d¡
y1t¡
y1n¡
y1hì
y1chì
y1kì
y1rì
y1dì
y1tì
y1nì
y1dØ
y1tØ
y1nØ
 1§a
 1ça
 1Ÿa
 1ýa
 1ca
 1ja
 1Ôa
 1œa
 1åa
 1ha
 1cha
 1ka
 1ra
 1da
 1ta
 1na
 1§e
 1çe
 1Ÿe
 1ýe
 1ce
 1je
 1he
 1che
 1ke
 1re
 1de
 1te
 1ne
 1§i
 1çi
 1Ÿi
 1ýi
 1ci
 1ji
 1di
 1ti
 1ni
 1§o
 1ço
 1Ÿo
 1ýo
 1co
 1jo
 1Ôo
 1œo
 1åo
 1ho
 1cho
 1ko
 1ro
 1do
 1to
 1no
 1§u
 1çu
 1Ÿu
 1ýu
 1cu
 1ju
 1Ôu
 1œu
 1åu
 1hu
 1chu
 1ku
 1ru
 1du
 1tu
 1nu
 1hy
 1chy
 1ky
 1ry
 1dy
 1ty
 1ny
 1§ 
 1ç 
 1Ÿ 
 1ý 
 1c 
 1j 
 1h 
 1ch 
 1k 
 1r 
 1d 
 1t 
 1n 
 1§‚
 1ç‚
 1Ÿ‚
 1ý‚
 1c‚
 1j‚
 1h‚
 1ch‚
 1k‚
 1r‚
 1d‚
 1t‚
 1n‚
 1§¡
 1ç¡
 1Ÿ¡
 1ý¡
 1c¡
 1j¡
 1d¡
 1t¡
 1n¡
 1hì
 1chì
 1kì
 1rì
 1dì
 1tì
 1nì
 1dØ
 1tØ
 1nØ
‚1§a
‚1ça
‚1Ÿa
‚1ýa
‚1ca
‚1ja
‚1Ôa
‚1œa
‚1åa
‚1ha
‚1cha
‚1ka
‚1ra
‚1da
‚1ta
‚1na
‚1§e
‚1çe
‚1Ÿe
‚1ýe
‚1ce
‚1je
‚1he
‚1che
‚1ke
‚1re
‚1de
‚1te
‚1ne
‚1§i
‚1çi
‚1Ÿi
‚1ýi
‚1ci
‚1ji
‚1di
‚1ti
‚1ni
‚1§o
‚1ço
‚1Ÿo
‚1ýo
‚1co
‚1jo
‚1Ôo
‚1œo
‚1ho
‚1cho
‚1ko
‚1ro
‚1do
‚1to
‚1no
‚1§u
‚1çu
‚1Ÿu
‚1ýu
‚1cu
‚1ju
‚1Ôu
‚1œu
‚1hu
‚1chu
‚1ku
‚1ru
‚1du
‚1tu
‚1nu
‚1hy
‚1chy
‚1ky
‚1ry
‚1dy
‚1ty
‚1ny
‚1§ 
‚1ç 
‚1Ÿ 
‚1ý 
‚1c 
‚1j 
‚1h 
‚1ch 
‚1k 
‚1r 
‚1d 
‚1t 
‚1n 
‚1§‚
‚1ç‚
‚1Ÿ‚
‚1ý‚
‚1c‚
‚1j‚
‚1h‚
‚1ch‚
‚1k‚
‚1r‚
‚1d‚
‚1t‚
‚1n‚
‚1§¡
‚1ç¡
‚1Ÿ¡
‚1ý¡
‚1c¡
‚1j¡
‚1d¡
‚1t¡
‚1n¡
‚1hì
‚1chì
‚1kì
‚1rì
‚1dì
‚1tì
‚1nì
‚1dØ
‚1tØ
‚1nØ
¡1§a
¡1ça
¡1Ÿa
¡1ýa
¡1ca
¡1ja
¡1Ôa
¡1œa
¡1åa
¡1ha
¡1cha
¡1ka
¡1ra
¡1da
¡1ta
¡1na
¡1§e
¡1çe
¡1Ÿe
¡1ýe
¡1ce
¡1je
¡1he
¡1che
¡1ke
¡1re
¡1de
¡1te
¡1ne
¡1§i
¡1çi
¡1Ÿi
¡1ýi
¡1ci
¡1ji
¡1di
¡1ti
¡1ni
¡1§o
¡1ço
¡1Ÿo
¡1ýo
¡1co
¡1jo
¡1Ôo
¡1œo
¡1åo
¡1ho
¡1cho
¡1ko
¡1ro
¡1do
¡1to
¡1no
¡1§u
¡1çu
¡1Ÿu
¡1ýu
¡1cu
¡1ju
¡1Ôu
¡1œu
¡1åu
¡1hu
¡1chu
¡1ku
¡1ru
¡1du
¡1tu
¡1nu
¡1hy
¡1chy
¡1ky
¡1ry
¡1dy
¡1ty
¡1ny
¡1§ 
¡1ç 
¡1Ÿ 
¡1ý 
¡1c 
¡1j 
¡1Ô 
¡1œ 
¡1å 
¡1h 
¡1ch 
¡1k 
¡1r 
¡1d 
¡1t 
¡1n 
¡1§‚
¡1ç‚
¡1Ÿ‚
¡1ý‚
¡1c‚
¡1j‚
¡1h‚
¡1ch‚
¡1k‚
¡1r‚
¡1d‚
¡1t‚
¡1n‚
¡1§¡
¡1ç¡
¡1Ÿ¡
¡1ý¡
¡1c¡
¡1j¡
¡1d¡
¡1t¡
¡1n¡
¡1hì
¡1chì
¡1kì
¡1rì
¡1dì
¡1tì
¡1nì
¡1dØ
¡1tØ
¡1nØ
¢1§a
¢1da
¢1do
¢1du
¢1ta
¢1tu
¢1to
¢1na
¢1nu
¢1no
¢1§e
¢1ýe
¢1je
¢1ti
¢1ni
Ø1§a
Ø1ça
Ø1Ÿa
Ø1ýa
Ø1ca
Ø1ja
Ø1ha
Ø1cha
Ø1ka
Ø1ra
Ø1da
Ø1ta
Ø1na
Ø1§e
Ø1çe
Ø1Ÿe
Ø1ýe
Ø1ce
Ø1je
Ø1he
Ø1che
Ø1ke
Ø1re
Ø1de
Ø1te
Ø1ne
Ø1§i
Ø1çi
Ø1Ÿi
Ø1ýi
Ø1ci
Ø1ji
Ø1di
Ø1ti
Ø1ni
Ø1§o
Ø1ço
Ø1Ÿo
Ø1ýo
Ø1co
Ø1jo
Ø1ho
Ø1cho
Ø1ko
Ø1ro
Ø1do
Ø1to
Ø1no
Ø1§u
Ø1çu
Ø1Ÿu
Ø1ýu
Ø1cu
Ø1ju
Ø1hu
Ø1chu
Ø1ku
Ø1ru
Ø1du
Ø1tu
Ø1nu
Ø1hy
Ø1chy
Ø1ky
Ø1ry
Ø1dy
Ø1ty
Ø1ny
Ø1§ 
Ø1ç 
Ø1Ÿ 
Ø1ý 
Ø1c 
Ø1j 
Ø1h 
Ø1ch 
Ø1k 
Ø1r 
Ø1d 
Ø1t 
Ø1n 
Ø1§‚
Ø1ç‚
Ø1Ÿ‚
Ø1ý‚
Ø1c‚
Ø1j‚
Ø1ch‚
Ø1k‚
Ø1r‚
Ø1d‚
Ø1t‚
Ø1n‚
Ø1§¡
Ø1ç¡
Ø1Ÿ¡
Ø1ý¡
Ø1c¡
Ø1j¡
Ø1d¡
Ø1t¡
Ø1n¡
Ø1hì
Ø1chì
Ø1kì
Ø1rì
Ø1dì
Ø1tì
Ø1nì
Ø1dØ
Ø1tØ
Ø1nØ
a1ga
a1ge
a1gi
a1go
a1g¢
a1gu
e1ga
e1ge
e1gi
e1go
e1gu
e1g 
i1ga
i1ge
i1gi
i1go
i1gu
i1g 
i1g¢
o1ga
o1ge
o1gi
o1go
o1gu
u1ga
u1ge
u1gi
u1gy
u1go
u1gu
a1xa
a1xe
a1xi
a1xo
a1xu
a1x¢
e1xa
e1xe
e1xi
e1xo
e1xu
i1xa
i1xe
i1xi
i1xo
i1xu
o1xa
o1xe
o1xi
o1xo
o1xu
…1zu
u1z…
…1zo
o1z…
Ø1z…
…1z¡
¡1z…
¢1z…
…1zi
i1z…
…1z 
 1z…
‚1z…
…1ze
e1z…
…1za
a1z…
ì1z…
…1z…
…1zy
y1z…
…1åu
u1å…
…1åo
o1å…
…1å¡
¢1å…
…1åi
i1å…
 1å…
‚1å…
e1å…
…1åa
a1å…
ì1å…
…1vu
u1v…
…1vo
o1v…
…1vØ
Ø1v…
…1v¡
¡1v…
…1vi
i1v…
 1v…
‚1v…
…1ve
e1v…
…1va
a1v…
ì1v…
…1v…
…1vy
y1v…
…1œa
…1tu
u1t…
…1to
o1t…
…1tØ
Ø1t…
…1t¡
¡1t…
¢1t…
…1ti
i1t…
 1t…
‚1t…
…1te
e1t…
…1ta
a1t…
ì1t…
…1t…
…1ty
y1t…
…1su
u1s…
…1so
o1s…
Ø1s…
…1s¡
¡1s…
¢1s…
…1si
i1s…
…1s 
 1s…
‚1s…
…1se
e1s…
…1sa
a1s…
ì1s…
…1sy
y1s…
…1ru
u1r…
…1ro
o1r…
Ø1r…
¡1r…
¢1r…
i1r…
…1r 
 1r…
‚1r…
…1re
e1r…
…1ra
a1r…
…1rì
ì1r…
…1r…
…1ry
y1r…
u1p…
…1po
o1p…
…1pØ
Ø1p…
…1p¡
¡1p…
i1p…
‚1p…
…1pe
e1p…
a1p…
ì1p…
y1p…
u1n…
o1n…
…1nØ
Ø1n…
…1n¡
¡1n…
¢1n…
…1ni
i1n…
 1n…
‚1n…
…1ne
e1n…
…1na
a1n…
ì1n…
…1n…
…1ny
y1n…
u1m…
o1m…
…1mØ
Ø1m…
¡1m…
¢1m…
i1m…
 1m…
‚1m…
e1m…
…1ma
a1m…
ì1m…
…1m…
…1my
y1m…
…1lu
u1l…
…1lo
o1l…
Ø1l…
…1l¡
¡1l…
¢1l…
…1li
i1l…
 1l…
‚1l…
…1le
e1l…
…1la
a1l…
…1lì
ì1l…
…1l…
…1ly
y1l…
u1k…
…1ko
o1k…
Ø1k…
¡1k…
¢1k…
i1k…
 1k…
‚1k…
e1k…
…1ka
a1k…
ì1k…
…1ky
y1k…
u1j…
o1j…
Ø1j…
…1j¡
¡1j…
¢1j…
…1ji
i1j…
 1j…
‚1j…
…1je
e1j…
…1ja
a1j…
ì1j…
y1j…
u1h…
o1h…
Ø1h…
¡1h…
i1h…
…1h 
 1h…
‚1h…
…1he
e1h…
…1ha
a1h…
…1h…
…1hy
y1h…
‚1f…
a1f…
y1f…
…1§u
u1§…
…1§o
o1§…
Ø1§…
…1§¡
¡1§…
¢1§…
…1§i
i1§…
…1§ 
 1§…
‚1§…
…1§e
e1§…
…1§a
a1§…
ì1§…
y1§…
…1du
u1d…
…1do
o1d…
…1dØ
Ø1d…
¡1d…
¢1d…
…1di
i1d…
 1d…
‚1d…
e1d…
…1da
a1d…
ì1d…
…1dy
y1d…
u1c…
o1c…
Ø1c…
…1c¡
¡1c…
i1c…
 1c…
e1c…
a1c…
ì1c…
y1c…
u1b…
o1b…
…1bØ
Ø1b…
¡1b…
¢1b…
i1b…
 1b…
‚1b…
e1b…
…1ba
a1b…
ì1b…
…1by
y1b…
u1Ÿ…
o1Ÿ…
Ø1Ÿ…
¡1Ÿ…
…1Ÿi
i1Ÿ…
 1Ÿ…
…1Ÿe
e1Ÿ…
a1Ÿ…
ì1Ÿ…
…1Ÿy
y1Ÿ…
u1Ô…
o1Ô…
¡1Ô…
 1Ô…
‚1Ô…
e1Ô…
a1Ô…
…1chu
u1ch…
…1cho
o1ch…
Ø1ch…
¡1ch…
i1ch…
 1ch…
e1ch…
…1cha
a1ch…
…1chì
ì1ch…
…1ch…
…1chy
y1ch…
u1ý…
o1ý…
Ø1ý…
…1ý¡
¡1ý…
…1ýi
i1ý…
 1ý…
‚1ý…
…1ýe
e1ý…
a1ý…
ì1ý…
y1ý…
…1çu
u1ç…
…1ço
o1ç…
Ø1ç…
…1ç¡
¡1ç…
…1çi
i1ç…
 1ç…
‚1ç…
…1çe
e1ç…
…1ça
a1ç…
ì1ç…
…1ç…
y1ç…
u1bu
u1fu
u1lu
u1mu
u1pu
u1su
u1vu
u1zu
u1bo
u1fo
u1lo
u1mo
u1po
u1so
u1vo
u1zo
u1bØ
u1mØ
u1pØ
u1vØ
u1b¡
u1f¡
u1l¡
u1m¡
u1p¡
u1s¡
u1v¡
u1z¡
u1bi
u1fi
u1li
u1mi
u1pi
u1si
u1vi
u1zi
u1b 
u1f 
u1l 
u1m 
u1p 
u1s 
u1v 
u1z 
u1b‚
u1l‚
u1m‚
u1p‚
u1s‚
u1v‚
u1z‚
u1be
u1fe
u1le
u1me
u1pe
u1se
u1ve
u1ze
u1ba
u1fa
u1la
u1ma
u1pa
u1sa
u1va
u1za
u1bì
u1lì
u1mì
u1pì
u1sì
u1vì
u1zì
u1by
u1fy
u1my
u1py
u1sy
u1vy
o1bu
o1fu
o1lu
o1mu
o1pu
o1su
o1vu
o1zu
o1bo
o1fo
o1lo
o1mo
o1po
o1so
o1vo
o1zo
o1bØ
o1mØ
o1pØ
o1vØ
o1b¡
o1f¡
o1l¡
o1m¡
o1p¡
o1s¡
o1v¡
o1z¡
o1f¢
o1z¢
o1bi
o1fi
o1li
o1mi
o1pi
o1si
o1vi
o1zi
o1b 
o1f 
o1l 
o1m 
o1p 
o1s 
o1v 
o1z 
o1b‚
o1f‚
o1l‚
o1m‚
o1p‚
o1s‚
o1v‚
o1z‚
o1be
o1fe
o1le
o1me
o1pe
o1se
o1ve
o1ze
o1ba
o1fa
o1la
o1ma
o1pa
o1sa
o1va
o1za
o1bì
o1lì
o1mì
o1pì
o1sì
o1vì
o1zì
o1by
o1ly
o1my
o1py
o1sy
o1vy
o1zy
£1lu
£1su
£1zu
£1bo
£1lo
£1mo
£1po
£1vo
£1bØ
£1mØ
£1pØ
£1vØ
£1p¡
£1li
£1pi
£1si
£1vi
£1zi
£1le
£1se
£1ze
£1pa
£1sa
£1va
£1by
£1ly
£1my
Ø1bu
Ø1lu
Ø1mu
Ø1pu
Ø1su
Ø1vu
Ø1zu
Ø1bo
Ø1fo
Ø1lo
Ø1mo
Ø1po
Ø1so
Ø1vo
Ø1zo
Ø1mØ
Ø1vØ
Ø1b¡
Ø1l¡
Ø1m¡
Ø1p¡
Ø1s¡
Ø1v¡
Ø1z¡
Ø1li
Ø1mi
Ø1pi
Ø1si
Ø1vi
Ø1zi
Ø1b 
Ø1l 
Ø1m 
Ø1p 
Ø1s 
Ø1v 
Ø1z 
Ø1l‚
Ø1m‚
Ø1p‚
Ø1s‚
Ø1v‚
Ø1z‚
Ø1be
Ø1le
Ø1me
Ø1pe
Ø1se
Ø1ve
Ø1ze
Ø1ba
Ø1la
Ø1ma
Ø1pa
Ø1sa
Ø1va
Ø1za
Ø1lì
Ø1mì
Ø1pì
Ø1sì
Ø1vì
Ø1zì
Ø1by
Ø1ly
Ø1my
Ø1py
Ø1sy
Ø1vy
Ø1zy
¡1bu
¡1fu
¡1lu
¡1mu
¡1pu
¡1su
¡1vu
¡1zu
¡1bo
¡1fo
¡1lo
¡1mo
¡1po
¡1so
¡1vo
¡1zo
¡1bØ
¡1mØ
¡1vØ
¡1b¡
¡1l¡
¡1p¡
¡1v¡
¡1z¡
¡1bi
¡1li
¡1mi
¡1pi
¡1si
¡1vi
¡1zi
¡1b 
¡1l 
¡1m 
¡1p 
¡1s 
¡1v 
¡1z 
¡1b‚
¡1l‚
¡1m‚
¡1p‚
¡1s‚
¡1v‚
¡1z‚
¡1be
¡1le
¡1me
¡1pe
¡1se
¡1ve
¡1ze
¡1ba
¡1la
¡1ma
¡1pa
¡1sa
¡1va
¡1za
¡1lì
¡1mì
¡1sì
¡1vì
¡1zì
¡1by
¡1fy
¡1ly
¡1my
¡1py
¡1sy
¡1vy
¡1zy
¢1bu
¢1lu
¢1mu
¢1pu
¢1su
¢1vu
¢1zu
¢1lo
¢1po
¢1so
¢1vo
¢1zo
¢1bØ
¢1mØ
¢1vØ
¢1s¡
¢1v¡
¢1z¡
¢1fi
¢1zi
¢1l‚
¢1v‚
¢1z‚
¢1le
¢1me
¢1ve
¢1ze
¢1ba
¢1fa
¢1la
¢1ma
¢1pa
¢1sa
¢1va
¢1za
¢1by
¢1fy
¢1ly
¢1my
¢1py
¢1sy
¢1vy
¢1zy
i1bu
i1lu
i1mu
i1pu
i1su
i1vu
i1zu
i1bo
i1fo
i1lo
i1mo
i1po
i1so
i1vo
i1zo
i1bØ
i1mØ
i1pØ
i1vØ
i1b¡
i1l¡
i1m¡
i1p¡
i1s¡
i1v¡
i1z¡
i1v¢
i1bi
i1fi
i1li
i1mi
i1pi
i1si
i1vi
i1zi
i1b 
i1l 
i1m 
i1p 
i1s 
i1v 
i1z 
i1b‚
i1l‚
i1m‚
i1p‚
i1s‚
i1v‚
i1z‚
i1be
i1fe
i1le
i1me
i1pe
i1se
i1ve
i1ze
i1ba
i1fa
i1la
i1ma
i1pa
i1sa
i1va
i1za
i1bì
i1lì
i1mì
i1pì
i1sì
i1vì
i1zì
i1by
i1fy
i1ly
i1my
i1py
i1sy
i1vy
i1zy
 1bu
 1fu
 1lu
 1mu
 1pu
 1su
 1vu
 1zu
 1bo
 1lo
 1mo
 1po
 1so
 1vo
 1zo
 1bØ
 1fØ
 1mØ
 1pØ
 1vØ
 1b¡
 1f¡
 1l¡
 1m¡
 1p¡
 1s¡
 1v¡
 1z¡
 1bi
 1fi
 1li
 1mi
 1pi
 1si
 1vi
 1zi
 1b 
 1l 
 1m 
 1p 
 1s 
 1v 
 1z 
 1b‚
 1l‚
 1m‚
 1p‚
 1s‚
 1v‚
 1z‚
 1be
 1fe
 1le
 1me
 1pe
 1se
 1ve
 1ze
 1ba
 1fa
 1la
 1ma
 1pa
 1sa
 1va
 1za
 1lì
 1mì
 1pì
 1sì
 1vì
 1zì
 1by
 1fy
 1ly
 1my
 1py
 1sy
 1vy
 1zy
‚1bu
‚1fu
‚1lu
‚1mu
‚1pu
‚1su
‚1vu
‚1zu
‚1bo
‚1lo
‚1mo
‚1po
‚1so
‚1vo
‚1zo
‚1mØ
‚1pØ
‚1vØ
‚1fi
‚1mi
‚1pi
‚1si
‚1vi
‚1zi
‚1b 
‚1v 
‚1z 
‚1l‚
‚1fe
‚1le
‚1me
‚1pe
‚1se
‚1ve
‚1ze
‚1ba
‚1la
‚1ma
‚1pa
‚1sa
‚1va
‚1za
‚1by
‚1ly
‚1my
‚1sy
‚1vy
‚1zy
e1bu
e1fu
e1lu
e1mu
e1pu
e1su
e1vu
e1zu
e1bo
e1fo
e1lo
e1mo
e1po
e1so
e1vo
e1zo
e1bØ
e1mØ
e1pØ
e1vØ
e1b¡
e1l¡
e1m¡
e1p¡
e1s¡
e1v¡
e1z¡
e1l¢
e1z¢
e1bi
e1fi
e1li
e1mi
e1pi
e1si
e1vi
e1zi
e1b 
e1f 
e1l 
e1m 
e1p 
e1s 
e1v 
e1z 
e1b‚
e1l‚
e1m‚
e1p‚
e1s‚
e1v‚
e1z‚
e1be
e1fe
e1le
e1me
e1pe
e1se
e1ve
e1ze
e1ba
e1fa
e1la
e1ma
e1pa
e1sa
e1va
e1za
e1bì
e1lì
e1mì
e1pì
e1sì
e1vì
e1zì
e1by
e1ly
e1my
e1py
e1sy
e1vy
e1zy
a1bu
a1fu
a1lu
a1mu
a1pu
a1su
a1vu
a1zu
a1bo
a1fo
a1lo
a1mo
a1po
a1so
a1vo
a1zo
a1bØ
a1mØ
a1pØ
a1vØ
a1b¡
a1f¡
a1l¡
a1m¡
a1p¡
a1s¡
a1v¡
a1z¡
a1l¢
a1bi
a1fi
a1li
a1mi
a1pi
a1si
a1vi
a1zi
a1b 
a1f 
a1l 
a1m 
a1p 
a1s 
a1v 
a1z 
a1b‚
a1f‚
a1l‚
a1m‚
a1p‚
a1s‚
a1v‚
